Florida, session 2026, HB503.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 383.3363, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb503-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 503 2026
383.3363 Education on drowning prevention safety measures
and safe bathing practices.—
(1) The Department of Health shall develop educational
materials on drowning prevention safety measures and safe
bathing practices to be distributed to parents or caregivers as
part of postpartum or childbirth education provided by
hospitals, birth centers, home birth providers, and childbirth
educators in this state. The materials must include, but need
not be limited to, instruction on all of the following:
(a) The increased risk of drowning for infants and
toddlers in bathtubs, pools, and other water sources, citing
available data on such drownings.
(b) Water safety measures parents can employ to prevent
drowning, emphasizing the importance of constant supervision of
infants and children while they are around water and the
benefits of early childhood swimming lessons and water
competency programs as an added layer of protection from
drownings.
(c) Additional safety hazards in the home setting and
evidence-based safe bathing practices.
(2) Each hospital, birth center, and home birth provider
providing maternity, prenatal, and newborn services shall
provide the educational materials developed under subsection (1)
to the parents or caregivers of a newborn as part of its
postpartum education and care. Hospitals, birth centers, and
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb503-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 503 2026
home birth providers shall maintain proof of compliance with
this subsection and make such records available to the Agency
for Health Care Administration upon request.
(3) Childbirth educators shall provide the educational
materials developed under subsection (1) to the parents or
caregivers receiving childbirth education.
Section 2. Paragraph (j) is added to subsection (4) of
section 383.318, Florida Statutes, to read:
383.318 Postpartum care for birth center clients and
infants.—
(4) The birth center shall provide a postpartum evaluation
and followup care that includes all of the following:
(j) Provision of the educational materials on drowning
prevention safety measures and safe bathing practices developed
by the Department of Health under s. 383.3363. Birth centers
shall maintain proof of compliance with the requirements of this
paragraph and make such records available to the Agency for
Health Care Administration upon request.
Section 3. Section 395.1053, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
395.1053 Postpartum education.—
(1) A hospital that provides birthing services shall
provide each parent with postpartum education on the care of
newborns, which must include all of the following:
(a) incorporate Information on safe sleep practices and
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb503-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 503 2026
the possible causes of Sudden Unexpected Infant Death. into the
hospital's postpartum instruction on the care of newborns and
provide to each parent
(b) Provision of the informational pamphlet on infant and
childhood eye and vision disorders created by the department
pursuant to s. 383.14(3)(h).
(c) Provision of the educational materials on drowning
prevention safety measures and safe bathing practices developed
by the department under s. 383.3363.
(2) Hospitals shall maintain proof of compliance with the
requirements of this section and make such records available to
the agency upon request.
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb503-00